Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Certificate of Authority.
Judgment debtor was not proper person to serve process on against nonresident in garnishment proceeding based on such judgment. Hirsch Bros. & Co. v. R. E. Kennington Co., 155 Miss. 242, 124 So. 344, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 285 (Miss. 1929).

Jurisdiction of foreign corporation suing in state is not obtained by service of summons on its attorney. Delta Ins. & Realty Agency v. Fourth Nat'l Bank, 146 Miss. 11, 111 So. 435, 1927 Miss. LEXIS 184 (Miss. 1927).

Mere soliciting agent of foreign corporation not doing business in state is not an agent on whom process may be served; the statute contemplates agents with general authority and discretion and not mere employees. Saxony Mills v. Wagner & Co., 94 Miss. 233, 47 So. 899, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 32 (Miss. 1908).

Return on summons “executed personally by delivering to E. M. agent of and for” defendant held insufficient to support decree pro confesso. National Surety Co. v. Board of Sup'rs, 120 Miss. 706, 83 So. 8, 1919 Miss. LEXIS 125 (Miss. 1919).

Service of process held void where return did not show relation of party on whom served to defendant. Supreme Ruling, F. M. C. v. Sommers, 108 Miss. 54, 66 So. 322, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 166 (Miss. 1914).

The sending, by registered mail, by the clerk of the court, of a copy of a summons in an action against the Cudahy Packing Co., a Maine corporation, addressed to “The Cudahy Packing Co., Chicago, Ill.,” was not effectual notice to the defendant, although the return receipt bore the signature “Cudahy Packing Co., H. Bogers,” where it appeared that there were five or six corporations organized and existing under the laws of different states, all named “Cudahy Packing Co.,” and that all these corporations had their general business offices in the same building in Chicago, but that each had a different setup for the handling therein of the details of their respective corporate businesses, and the mailing of the copy of the summons was so addressed and sent as to make it uncertain whether it would be received by the particular defendant, rather than by some other person or corporation. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

Attempted service on agent September 6, 1915, and mailing of summons December 30, 1915, calling for appearance of corporation at rules September 13 did not comply with this section [Code 1942, § 5346]. Columbia Star Milling Co. v. Brand, 115 Miss. 625, 76 So. 557, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 241 (Miss. 1917).

Default judgment held erroneous where clerk failed to mail notice as required. Eminent Household of Columbian Woodmen v. Lundy, 110 Miss. 881, 71 So. 16, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 222 (Miss. 1916).

Where a foreign corporation, which made no appearance in circuit court, and suffered a default judgment to be entered against it, appealed to the supreme court, and the record showed that the mailing of a copy of the summons had not complied with the statutory requirement so as to give the circuit court territorial jurisdiction over the corporation, if the circuit court, upon remand of the case, took jurisdiction after the issue of territorial jurisdiction was first presented and determined, the appellant corporation might (which by appeal had taken notice of the pendency of the action), then proceed upon the merits, and on appeal might still insist upon and have a review of the question of territorial jurisdiction. Cudahy Packing Co. v. Smith, 191 Miss. 31, 2 So. 2d 347, 1941 Miss. LEXIS 129 (Miss. 1941).

Where process on a foreign corporation is invalid or ineffectual, and corporation does not appear in answer to suit, question of jurisdiction of the person may be raised in any appropriate proceeding, but, if corporation files a motion to quash process, corporation is brought into court by appearing for purpose of quashing process, even though process may be insufficient within itself to bring corporation into court, and thereby court is given jurisdiction of the person notwithstanding any defect in process. Gridley, Maxon & Co. v. Turner, 179 Miss. 890, 176 So. 733, 177 So. 362, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 83 (Miss. 1937), overruled,
Mladinich v. Kohn, 250 Miss. 138, 164 So. 2d 785, 1964 Miss. LEXIS 451 (Miss. 1964).

Where nonresident defendant corporation in attachment suit was not brought in by publication of summons, and attempted service of summons on agent was not within county where suit was brought, the appearance of the defendant in state court for the sole purpose of procuring the removal of the cause to the federal court did not constitute such an appearance that, upon remand of the cause, defendant was then in state court without necessity of further process. McCoy v. Watson, 153 Miss. 416, 121 So. 116, 1929 Miss. LEXIS 35 (Miss. 1929).

But where foreign trainmen’s brotherhood, engaged in insurance business instate, had never designated state insurance commissioner as its agent for service of process, service of process on association may properly be made in same manner as provided for service on foreign corporations doing business in state. Brotherhood of Railroad Trainmen v. Agnew, 170 Miss. 604, 155 So. 205, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 155 (Miss. 1934).

This section [Code 1942, § 5346] does not apply to insurance companies who have filed power of attorney with insurance commissioner, Fidelity & Casualty Co. v. Cross (1921) 127 Miss 31, 89 So 780; nor to insurance companies appointing agent for service of process. Great Southern Life Ins. Co. v. Gomillion, 145 Miss. 314, 110 So. 770, 1927 Miss. LEXIS 116 (Miss. 1927).

Railroad doing only interstate business is not denied due process by serving one of its bona fide agents within the state in a cause of action accruing elsewhere. Vicksburg, S. & P. R. Co. v. Forcheimer, 113 Miss. 531, 74 So. 418, 1917 Miss. LEXIS 130 (Miss. 1917).

If foreign corporation is qualified to do business in State of Mississippi, even though it may not be doing any business, its agent for process may be served and courts have personal jurisdiction over that corporation; actually doing business in state has nothing to do with personal jurisdiction where foreign corporation has qualified to do business in state; corporation qualifying to do business in state, under appropriate statutes, becomes like individual as far as suit is concerned. Read v. Sonat Offshore Drilling, Inc., 515 So. 2d 1229, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2929 (Miss. 1987).

In a diversity action a federal district court in Mississippi would have jurisdiction over a nonresident car manufacturer pursuant to Miss Code § 79-3-229 in a suit by a nonresident plaintiff pleading a cause of action which arose entirely out-of-state, where the manufacturer was expressly authorized to do business in Mississippi, was actually doing business, and had designated a resident agent upon whom process was served pursuant to § 79-3-229. Cowan v. Ford Motor Co., 694 F.2d 104, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23146 (5th Cir. Miss. 1982).

A foreign credit corporation which has an agent in Mississippi for the purpose of calling upon prospective sellers of title retention notes to solicit and induce them to submit the collateral notes taken from their customers to the office of the credit corporation in Memphis, Tennessee, furnished an automobile to its agent for use in calling on manufacturers and dealers in Mississippi, and offered its services to dealers to collect delinquent money due on notes, or to recover the possession of property described in the notes, was not engaged in doing business in Mississippi within the purview of this section [Code 1942, § 5309-230]. Ross Constr. Co. v. U. M. & M. Credit Corp., 214 So. 2d 822, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1336 (Miss. 1968).

Service of process on a foreign corporation’s statutory agent does not confer jurisdiction of an action by a nonresident or a cause of action accruing in another state. Stavang v. American Potash & Chemical Corp., 227 F. Supp. 786, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8326 (S.D. Miss. 1964), aff'd, 344 F.2d 117, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 5882 (5th Cir. Miss. 1965).

A foreign corporation which has never qualified to do business in Mississippi is not precluded from suing there on a policy of liability insurance issued to it in another state, in respect of judgment recovered against it in Mississippi after its withdrawal from the state for negligence in the performance of services there. Aerial Agricultural Service, Inc. v. Till, 207 F. Supp. 50, 1962 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3655 (N.D. Miss. 1962).

All foreign corporations doing business in this state shall be subject to suit here to same extent that corporations of state are, whether cause of action accrued here or not, and this statute indicates general policy of equality and similarity of treatment as between foreign and domestic corporations. Poole v. Mississippi Publishers Corp., 208 Miss. 364, 44 So. 2d 467, 1950 Miss. LEXIS 255 (Miss. 1950).

Rule to effect that citizen of one state may be enjoined from prosecuting action against another citizen of same state applies equally when injunction is sought to restrain citizen of one state from prosecuting action against nonresident corporation doing business with lawful authority in such state. Poole v. Mississippi Publishers Corp., 208 Miss. 364, 44 So. 2d 467, 1950 Miss. LEXIS 255 (Miss. 1950).

Actions against Louisiana corporation brought in the federal district court for the southern district of Mississippi was proper where such corporation had appointed an agent for the service of process in accordance with this section [Code 1942, § 5319], such appointment being a consent by the corporation to be sued in the state, which waives the right to be sued only in the district of which it is an inhabitant, irrespective of the basis of federal jurisdiction. Amalgamated Ass'n of St., Elec. Ry. & Motor Coach Emples. of Am. v. Southern Bus Lines, Inc., 172 F.2d 946, 1949 U.S. App. LEXIS 3511 (5th Cir. Miss. 1949).

Maintenance by a foreign newspaper corporation of a news gathering office in the state, the employment of a resident contact man to recommend suitable persons to become local distributors in the state, and a contract with a truck operator to transport its papers into the state for sale and distribution by local distributor, did not constitute “doing business” in the state so as to make such corporation amenable to service of process in the state. Lee v. Memphis Pub. Co., 195 Miss. 264, 14 So. 2d 351, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 133 (Miss. 1943).

A foreign corporation operating a motor transportation line for the conveyance of passengers through a county of this state, and having a resident agent for the service of process in this state, could be sued in such county by a passenger, seeking to recover damages for personal injury sustained notwithstanding that the cause of action arose in Louisiana and the plaintiff was a temporary resident of this state. Tri-State Transit Co. v. Mondy, 194 Miss. 714, 12 So. 2d 920, 1943 Miss. LEXIS 85 (Miss. 1943).

General rule that withdrawal of foreign corporation from state does not revoke local agent’s authority to receive service of process or deprive local courts of jurisdiction of actions arising out of business done within the state cannot be extended to actions not incidental to or connected with business done in state by such foreign corporation. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

Plea to jurisdiction of consumer’s action against foreign corporate manufacturer for injuries allegedly caused by glass in candy made by such manufacturer and purchased from retail merchant held properly sustained, where service was had on corporation’s former agent after corporation’s withdrawal from state and it did not appear that candy allegedly causing injuries before such withdrawal was in any way connected with business done by manufacturer within the state. Walters v. Curtis Candy Co., 172 Miss. 187, 159 So. 560, 1935 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1935).

There was no statutory or other authority that would allow a Mississippi court to compel nonresident, non-parties to the litigation to produce documents in a breach of contract dispute between a seed company and a corporation. Syngenta Crop Prot., Inc. v. Monsanto Co., 908 So. 2d 121, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 466 (Miss. 2005).

Foreign corporation’s purchase within state of goods to be shipped into other state or country as doing business within state for purposes of jurisdiction or service of process.
12 A.L.R.2d 1439.

Federal or state law as controlling, in diversity action, whether foreign corporation is amenable to service of process in state.
6 A.L.R.3d 1103.

Attorney representing foreign corporation in litigation as its agent for service of process in unconnected actions or proceedings.
9 A.L.R.3d 738.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent.
17 A.L.R.3d 625.

Products liability: In personam jurisdiction over nonresident manufacturer or seller under “long-arm” statutes.
19 A.L.R.3d 13.

Applicability, to actions not based on products liability, of state statutes or rules of court predicating in personam jurisdiction over foreign manufacturers and distributors upon use of their goods within state.
20 A.L.R.3d 957.

Construction and application of state statutes or rules of court predicating in personam jurisdiction over nonresidents or foreign corporations on making or performing a contract within the state.
23 A.L.R.3d 551.

Construction and application of state statutes or rules of court predicating in personam jurisdiction over nonresidents or foreign corporations on the commission of a tort within the state.
24 A.L.R.3d 532.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action.
23 A.L.R.5th 744.

Validity, construction, and application of “fiduciary shield” doctrine – modern cases.
79 A.L.R.5th 587.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 213- 215,
454,
476 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 11 et seq.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1815, 1937 et seq.

State regulation of judicial proceedings as violating commerce clause (Art I, 8, cl 3) of Federal Constitution – Supreme Court cases.
100 L. Ed. 2d 1049.